District of Columbia statutes.
5-608

Injuries or diseases received or contracted prior to enactment of chapter.

Nothing in this chapter shall be deemed to apply to any hospital, medical, surgical, or dental care or treatment or wage payments based upon an authorized leave of absence which a policeman or fireman is receiving or is entitled to receive from the District of Columbia for an injury received or disease contracted prior to enactment of this chapter.

History

Aug. 17, 1978, D.C. Law 2-100, § 9, 25 DCR 288

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 4-508.
1973 Ed., § 4-1008.